Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2107
Fees.

Each application or renewal under section 48-2105 shall be signed by the applicant and accompanied by a fee not to exceed forty dollars. The commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish the criteria for acceptability of filing documents and making payments electronically. The criteria may include requirements for electronic signatures. The commissioner may refuse to accept any electronic filings or payments that do not meet the criteria established. The fee shall not be required when an amendment to an application is submitted. The commissioner shall remit the fees collected under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB204, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB162, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB270, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB1016, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB191, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 20.
July 18, 2026